Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-244
Program; effect on contracting.

The enrollment option program does not preclude a school district from contracting with other school districts, educational service units, or other state-approved entities for the provision of services.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 14;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3414;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 48;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 57.
September 2, 2023